Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,111
Commission; powers and duties.

The commission shall:

(1) No later than July 1, 2025, establish criteria to accept or deny applications for registrations, including adopting, promulgating, and enforcing reasonable rules, regulations, and eligibility standards for such registrations;

(2) No later than October 1, 2025, begin granting registrations to applicants that meet eligibility standards and other requirements established by the commission;

(3) Grant, deny, revoke, and suspend registrations based upon reasonable criteria and procedures established by the commission;

(4) Have the authority to adopt, promulgate, and enforce distinct sets of rules and regulations for different categories of registered cannabis establishments;

(5) Administer oaths or affirmations as necessary to carry out the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act;

(6) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or the production of any records, books, memoranda, documents, or other papers or things at or prior to any hearing as is necessary to enable the commission to effectively discharge its duties;

(7) Inspect the operation of any registered cannabis establishment for the purpose of verifying compliance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission;

(8) Have the authority to impose, subject to judicial review under the Administrative Procedure Act, administrative fines for each violation of any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act;

(9) Collect administrative fines imposed under this section and remit the fines to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska;

(10) Establish procedures for the governance of the commission;

(11) Acquire necessary offices, facilities, counsel, and staff; and

(12) Do all things necessary and proper to carry out its powers and duties under the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, including the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations and such other actions as permitted by the Administrative Procedure Act.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, § 6.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.